Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1212.01
Unlawful
discharge of firearm; terms, defined.

For purposes
of sections 28-1212.02 and 28-1212.04:

(1) Aircraft means any
contrivance intended for and capable of transporting persons through the airspace;

(2) Inhabited means currently
being used for dwelling purposes; and

(3) Occupied means that
a person is physically present in a building, motor vehicle, or aircraft.

Laws 1990, LB 1018, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB771, § 11.